zh-CN: 滑翔机起飞方式: 飞机牵引; 汽车牵引; 橡筋弹射; 地面起飞（滑车）; 自行起飞（动力滑翔机）; 自行起飞（维持发动机）; 绞盘牵引; 其他
fi: Purjelentokoneen hinausmenetelmä: Lentohinaus; Autohinaus; Kumiköysilaukaisu; Maalaukaisu (apuvaunu); Itselähtöinen (moottoripurjelentokone); Itselähtöinen (apumoottori); Vintturihinaus; Muu
de: Startmethode des Segelflugzeugs: Flugzeugschlepp; Autoschlepp; Gummiseilstart; Bodenstart (Startwagen); Eigenstart (Motorsegler); Eigenstart (Heimkehrhilfe); Windenstart; Sonstige
en: Glider launch method: Aerotow; Auto-tow; Bungee launch; Ground launch (dolly); Self-launch (motor glider); Self-launch (sustainer engine); Winch launch; Other
pt-PT: Método Launch de planador: Reboque aéreo; Reboque por carro; Lançamento por elástico; Lançamento no solo (carrinho); Autolançamento (motoplanador); Autolançamento (motor de sustentação); Lançamento por guincho; Outro
sk-SK: Spôsob štartu vetroňa: Aerovlek; Autovlek; Štart gumovým lanom; Štart zo zeme (vozík); Samostatný štart (motorový klzák); Samostatný štart (pomocný motor); Štart navijakom; Iné
da: Svæveflyets startmetode: Flyslæb; Bilslæb; Elastikstart; Jordstart (dolly); Selvstart (motorsvævefly); Selvstart (hjælpemotor); Spilstart; Andet
hu: Siklóernyő indítási módja: Vontatás repülőgéppel; Autós vontatás; Gumiköteles indítás; Földi indítás (görgető kocsi); Önálló felszállás (motoros vitorlázórepülő); Önálló felszállás (segédmotor); Csörlős indítás; Egyéb
th: วิธี Launch เครื่องร่อน: ใช้เครื่องบินลาก; ใช้รถลาก; ใช้เชือกยางยืด; ปล่อยจากพื้น (รถเข็น); ปล่อยตัวด้วยตัวเอง (เครื่องร่อนติดมอเตอร์); ปล่อยตัวด้วยตัวเอง (เครื่องยนต์ช่วยบิน); ใช้กว้านลาก; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Метод на излитане на планера: Авиовлаксиране; Автотеглене; Изстрелване с ластик; Наземно изстрелване (количка); Самостоятелно излитане (мотопланер); Самостоятелно излитане (спомагателен двигател); Изстрелване с лебедка; Друго
lt-LT: Sklandytuvo paleidimo metodas: Buksyravimas lėktuvu; Buksyravimas automobiliu; Guminio lyno startas; Startas nuo žemės (su vežimėliu); Savarankiškas startas (motorinis sklandytuvas); Savarankiškas startas (palaikomasis variklis); Startas išvelktuvu; Kita
pl: Metoda Launch szybowca: Holowanie samolotem; Holowanie za samochodem; Start z liną bungee; Start z ziemi (wózek); Samostart (motoszybowiec); Samostart (silnik dolotowy); Start z wyciągarki; Inna
it: Metodo di lancio dell'aliante: Traino aereo; Traino auto; Lancio con elastico; Lancio da terra (carrello); Decollo autonomo (motoaliante); Decollo autonomo (motore di sostentamento); Lancio con verricello; Altro
cs: Způsob vypouštění kluzáku: Aerovlek; Autovlek; Start pomocí gumového lana; Pozemní start (na vozíku); Samostatný start (motorový kluzák); Samostatný start (pomocný motor); Start navijákem; Ostatní
ru: Способ запуска планера: Аэробуксировка; Автобуксировка; Запуск с амортизатора; Запуск с земли (тележка); Самостоятельный взлет (мотопланер); Самостоятельный взлет (вспомогательный двигатель); Запуск с лебедки; Другое
nl: Zweefvliegtuig startmethode: Vliegtuigsleep; Autosleep; Elastiekstart; Grondstart (dolly); Zelfstart (motorzweefvliegtuig); Zelfstart (thuisbrengmotor); Lierstart; Overig
hr-HR: Metoda lansiranja jedrilice: Aerovuka; Auto-vuka; Katapultiranje (bungee); Polijetanje sa zemlje (kolica); Samostalno polijetanje (motorna jedrilica); Samostalno polijetanje (pomoćni motor); Polijetanje vitlom; Ostalo
vi: Phương pháp cất cánh tàu lượn: Tàu kéo trên không; Kéo bằng ô tô; Phóng bằng dây thun (Bungee); Phóng từ mặt đất (xe đẩy); Tự phóng (tàu lượn có động cơ); Tự phóng (động cơ duy trì); Phóng bằng tời; Khác
el: Μέθοδος απογείωσης με ανεμόπτερο: Αερορυμούλκηση; Αυτορυμούλκηση; Εκτόξευση με bungee; Εκτόξευση εδάφους (dolly); Αυτοεκτόξευση (μηχανοκίνητο ανεμόπτερο); Αυτοεκτόξευση (κινητήρας συντήρησης); Εκτόξευση με βίντσι; Άλλο
sv: Uppskjutningsmetod för glidflygplan: Flygbogsering; Bilbogsering; Gummirepsstart; Markstart (startvagn); Självstart (motorsegelflygplan); Självstart (hjälpmotor); Vinschstart; Övrigt
tr: Planör kalkış yöntemi: Uçakla çekme; Araçla çekme; Bungee fırlatma; Yerden fırlatma (taşıyıcı); Kendinden kalkışlı (motorlu planör); Kendinden kalkışlı (destek motoru); Vinçle fırlatma; Diğer
ja: グライダーのLaunch方法: 飛行機曳航; 自動車曳航; バンジー発航; グラウンドローンチ (ドリー); 自力発航 (モーターグライダー); 自力発航 (サステイナーエンジン); ウインチ曳航; その他
fr: Méthode de lancement du planeur: Remorquage aérien; Remorquage par treuil de voiture; Lancement par sandow; Lancement au sol (chariot); Lancement autonome (motoplaneur); Lancement autonome (moteur d’appoint); Lancement par treuil; Autre
zh-TW: 滑翔機起飛方式: 飛機拖曳; 汽車拖曳; 彈力索發射; 地面起飛 (滑車); 自行起飛 (動力滑翔機); 自行起飛 (維持動力引擎); 絞盤牽引起飛; 其他
ro-RO: Metoda de lansare a planorului: Remorcare aeriană; Remorcare auto; Lansare la sandou; Lansare la sol (cărucior); Autolansare (motoplanor); Autolansare (motor de susținere); Lansare la automosor; Altele
sl-SI: Metoda vzleta jadralnega letala: Aerozaprega; Avtovleka; Vzlet z elastiko; Vzlet s tal (z vozičkom); Samovzlet (motorno jadralno letalo); Samovzlet (s pomožnim motorjem); Vzlet z vitlom; Drugo
pt-BR: Método de lançamento do parapente: Reboque aéreo; Reboque por carro; Lançamento por elástico; Lançamento de solo (dolly); Autolançamento (motoplanador); Autolançamento (motor de sustentação); Lançamento por guincho; Outro
nb: Lansering av glidefly: Flyslep; Bilslep; Strikkstart; Bakkestart (tralle); Selvstartende (motorseilfly); Selvstartende (hjelpemotor); Vinsjstart; Annet
es: Método de lanzamiento del planeador: Remolque por avión; Remolque por automóvil; Lanzamiento con cuerda elástica; Lanzamiento desde tierra (plataforma móvil); Autolanzamiento (motoplaneador); Autolanzamiento (motor de sustentación); Lanzamiento con torno; Otro
ko: 글라이더 이륙 방법: 에어로토우; 오토토우; 번지 런치; 지상 런치(돌리); 자체 런치(모터 글라이더); 자체 런치(서스테이너 엔진); 윈치 런치; 기타